tables/de-g2-core.ctb
# liblouis: German grade 2 braille
#
#  Copyright (C) 2009 SBS Schweizerische Bibliothek für Blinde und Sehbehinderte
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#  DEUTSCHE KURZSCHRIFT - German Grade 2 Braille
#
#  Version 2009-11-19
#  christian.waldvogel@sbszh.ch
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


#
#   Einschränkungen
#   ---------------
#
#   - Optimiert für Neue Rechtschreibung
#   - Schweizer ss-Schreibung nicht berücksichtigt
#
#
#   Bekannte Probleme
#   -----------------
#
#   - Gross-/Kleinschreibung: caps begcaps endcaps ist nicht genug ...
#     es braucht Auszeichnung im Text.
#
#   - Wortersatzzstrich am Ende:
#     - Bis jetzt nur die Lautgruppen vor -\s und -,\s.
#     - Ausformulierte Ausnahmen müssen damit nachgerüstet werden.
#
#   Abzuklären
#   ----------
#
#   - "contraction" für Masseinheiten missbrauchen, erfordert eingeschaltetes
#     lettersign!
#




# class definitions
class a a
class b b
class c c
class d d
class e e
class er er
class f f
class h h
class g g
class i i
class j j
class k k
class l l
class m m
class n n
class r r
class s s
class t t
class u u
class z z
class kpvw kpvw
class konsonant bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz



# (4.1 Lautgruppenkürzungen)

# Doppelvokale
always frisbee 124-1235-24-234-12-15-15
always kaffee 13-1-124-124-15-15
always coffee 6-14-135-124-124-15-15
always toffee 2345-135-124-124-15-15
always dragee 145-1235-1-1245-15-15
always bungee 12-256-1245-15-15
always dorothee 145-26-135-2345-125-15-15
always cheese 1456-15-15-234-15
always pappmaschee 1234-1-1234-1234-134-1-156-15-15
always klischee 13-123-24-156-15-15
always yankee 6-13456-235-13-15-15
always gelee 1245-13456-15-15
always soufflee 234-135-136-124-124-123-15-15
always defilee 145-15-124-24-123-15-15
always klee 13-123-15-15
always renommee 1235-14-135-1346-15-15
always armee 356-134-15-15
always resümee 1235-123456-1256-134-15-15
always schnee 156-1345-15-15
always trainee 2345-1235-1-24-1345-15-15
always pralinee 1234-1235-1-123-35-15-15
always portmonee 1234-26-2345-134-135-1345-15-15
always kanapee 13-235-1-1234-15-15
always portepee 1234-26-236-1234-15-15
always separee 234-15-1234-356-15-15
always referee 1235-15-124-12456-15-15
always schikoree 156-24-13-26-15-15
always spree 234-1234-1235-15-15
always karree 13-356-1235-15-15
always porree 1234-26-1235-15-15
always püree 1234-1256-1235-15-15
always frikassee 124-1235-24-13-1-2346-15-15
always plissee 1234-123-24-2346-15-15
always varietee 1236-356-24-15-2345-15-15
always komitee 13-135-134-24-2345-15-15
always trustee 2345-1235-136-23456-15-15
always frottee 124-1235-135-2345-2345-15-15
always queen 6-12345-136-15-15-1345
always halloween 125-1-12345-135-2456-15-15-1345

always hawaii 125-1-2456-1-24-24
always ascii 1-234-6-14-24-24

always boom 12-135-135-134
always voodoo 1236-135-135-145-135-135
always yahoo 6-13456-1-125-135-135
always waterloo 2456-1-2345-12456-123-135-135
always shampoo 234-125-1-134-1234-135-135
always tattoo 2345-1-2345-2345-135-135
always daewoo 145-1-15-2456-135-135
always zoo 1356-135-135

# ABER (4.3.2 Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend oder in Wortverbindungen)
word aber 1
always aber 2-1
always aberdeen 1-12-12456-145-15-15-1345
midword aberech 1-23-1235-15-1456
midendword abereich 1-23-1235-146-1456
midendword abericht 1-23-2-3456
begmidword aberkann 1-12-12456-13-235-1345
always aberkenn 1-12-12456-13-14-1345
begmidword abernt 1-12-12456-1345-2345
prfword abernte 1-12-12456-1345-236
prfword aberntest 1-12-12456-1345-236-23456
prfword aberntet 1-12-12456-1345-236-2345
prfword aberntete 1-12-12456-1345-236-236
prfword abernteten 1-12-12456-1345-236-2345-14
prfword aberntetest 1-12-12456-1345-236-236-23456
prfword aberntetet 1-12-12456-1345-236-236-2345
always aberrans 1-12-12456-1235-235-234
always aberratio 1-12-12456-1235-1-2345-24-135
always aberration 1-12-12456-1235-5-1345
always aberrier 1-12-12456-1235-346-1235
always aberzieh 1-12-12456-1356-346-125
always aaberg 1-1-12-12456-1245
always cabernet 6-14-1-12-12456-1345-15-2345
sufword faber 124-1-12-12456
midword gaber 1245-1-23-1235
always gaberecht 1245-1-23-1235-2345
sufword haber 125-1-12-12456
always schaber 156-1-12-12456
always makaber 134-1-13-1-12-12456
always kandelaber 13-235-145-13456-1-12-12456
always laber 123-1-12-12456
always annaberg 235-1345-1-12-12456-1245
always araber 356-1-12-12456
always graber 1245-1235-1-12-12456
always traber 2345-1235-1-12-12456
begmidword tabern 2345-1-12-12456-1345
always waber 2456-1-12-12456

# ACH (4.1 Lautgruppenkürzungen)
midendword ach 56
endword achip 1-1456-24-1234
endword achips 1-1456-24-1234-234
begword aach 1-1-1456
prfword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-135-1235
begmidword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-26
always cach 6-14-1-1456
prfword each 15-1-1456
always beach 12-15-1-1456
always beacht 23-56-2345
prfword beachte 23-56-236
always beachtest 23-56-236-23456
always beachtet 23-56-236-2345
prfword beachtete 23-56-236-236
always teacher 2345-15-1-1456-12456
always teaching 2345-15-1-1456-35-1245
begmidword megach 134-15-1245-1-1456
always diachron 145-24-1-1456-1235-135-1345
always machia 134-1-1456-24-1
always machin 134-1-1456-35
always machis 134-1-1456-24-234
always nikomachisch 1345-24-13-135-134-56-24-156
always macho 134-1-1456-135
begmidword anachron 235-1-1456-1235-135-1345
always coach 6-14-135-1-1456
begword tetrach 2345-15-2345-1235-1-1456
midword tetrach 236-2345-1235-1-1456
always attach 1-2345-2345-1-1456
always blattachsel 12-123-1-2345-2345-56-234-13456
always detach 145-15-2345-1-1456
begmidword metach 134-15-2345-1-1456
begmidword gouach 1245-135-136-1-1456

# ÄHNLICH (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
always ähnlich 345-456

# AL  (4.1 Lautgruppenkürzungen)
begmidword al 25
always al-\s 25-36-0
always al-,\s 25-36-2-0
always aal 1-1-123
begmidword chinaalk 1456-35-1-25-13
always dalag 145-1-123-1-1245
begmidword daläg 145-1-123-345-1245
prfword daläge 145-1-123-345-12346
always dalieg 145-1-123-346-1245
prfword daliege 145-1-123-346-12346
sufword deal 145-15-1-123
always dealer 145-15-1-123-12456
always idealer 24-145-15-25-12456
always health 125-15-1-123-2345-125
begmidword sofalehn 234-135-124-1-123-2356-1345
begmidword yogalehr 6-13456-135-1245-1-123-2356-1235
begmidword medialeit 134-15-145-24-1-123-146-2345
before l begmidword mafia 134-1-124-24-1
begmidword asialad 1-234-24-1-123-1-145
begmidword asialäd 1-234-24-1-123-345-145
begmidword asialink 1-234-24-1-123-35-13
midword vinzial 1236-35-1356-24-25
begmidword sojalezi 234-135-245-1-123-15-1356-24
before l begmidword zodiakal 1356-135-145-24-1-13-25
before l begmidword wodka 2456-135-145-13-1
begmidword biotikal 12-24-135-2345-24-13-1-123
before l begmidword mokka 134-135-13-13-1
before l begmidword vokal 1236-135-13-25
always tombola 2345-135-134-12-135-123-1
begmidword kanal 13-235-25
before l begmidword sauna 234-16-1345-1
before l begmidword pharma 1234-125-356-134-1
begmidword europalet 126-1235-135-1234-25-15-2345
begmidword europalig 126-1235-135-1234-1-123-45
always nappaleder 1345-1-1234-1234-1-123-15-145-12456
before l begmidword kamera 13-1-134-12456-1
always kameralia 13-1-134-12456-25-24-1
always kameralist 13-1-134-12456-25-24-23456
always kameralistisch 13-1-134-12456-25-5-156
begmidword paraling 1234-356-1-123-35-1245
begmidword paralymp 1234-356-1-123-6-13456-134-1234
before l begmidword tundra 2345-256-145-1235-1
begmidword supraleit 234-136-1234-1235-1-123-146-2345
before l begmidword ultra 136-123-2345-1235-1
before l begword extra 1346-2345-1235-1
before l midword extra 15-6-1346-2345-1235-1
before l begword prosa 12345-234-1
before l midword prosa 1234-1235-135-234-1
begmidword metaling 134-15-2345-1-123-35-1245
begmidword metalog 134-15-2345-1-123-135-1245
always rastalock 1235-1-23456-1-123-135-46
begmidword lavalamp 123-1-1236-1-123-1-134-1234
begmidword lavalämp 123-1-1236-1-123-345-134-1234
before l begmidword maya 134-1-6-13456-1
before l begmidword pizza 1234-24-1356-1356-1
